Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-707
Reports; payment of tax.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 57-701 to 57-714, the reports required under the provisions of sections 57-701 to 57-714 shall be made and the taxes paid by the person required to make payments pursuant to section 57-702.

Laws 1955, c. 219, § 7, p. 613;

Laws 1983, LB 224, § 4.